Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-224
Oil and gas leases; trustee for remaindermen; invest income from royalties.

Under proper court order, the trustee shall be authorized to invest income from royalties in like manner as funds of guardianships may be invested, which investments shall remain intact until the ultimate taker is determined and shall then be paid over to such ultimate taker and the trust closed. Income from investments shall be paid to the life tenant or other person entitled thereto.

Laws 1951, c. 187, § 3, p. 694.